Hawaii statutes.
[§46-16.2] Commuter benefits
program. (a) The counties may adopt an ordinance establishing a commuter
benefits program that consists of one or more of the following commuter
benefits options:

(1) A program, consistent with section 132(f) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, allowing covered employees to elect
to exclude from taxable wages costs incurred for transit passes, vanpool
charges, and bicycle commuting costs up to the maximum amount allowed by
federal tax law;

(2) A program whereby the employer offers employees a
subsidy to offset the monthly cost of commuting via transit, vanpool, or
bicycle. The subsidy shall be equal to the lesser of the monthly cost of a
transit pass or the monthly cost of a vanpool; provided that a subsidy for
bicycle costs shall be in addition to subsidies for transit and vanpool costs;
or

(3) Transportation furnished by the employer at no
cost or low cost, as determined by the designated authority, to employees in a
vanpool, bus, or similar multi-passenger vehicle operated by or for the
employer.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prevent an
employer from offering a more generous commuter benefit that is otherwise
consistent with the requirements of the applicable commuter benefits
ordinance. Nothing in this section shall require employees to change their
method of commute. This section shall not be construed to absolve any employer
or other party from any obligation required by an existing collective
bargaining agreement with employees or any provision of law.

(c) For purposes of this section:

"Employee" means any person who is on
the employer's payroll and works in a full-time or part-time position. The
term includes any person who is entitled to payment of a minimum wage from an
employer under the Hawaii minimum wage law.

"Employer" means any person,
including corporate officers or executives, who directly or indirectly or
through an agent of any other person, including through the services of a
temporary service or staffing agency or similar entity, employs or exercises
control over the wages, hours, or working conditions of an employee.

"Transit pass" means any pass, token,
fare card, voucher, or similar item entitling a person to transportation on
public transit, including but not limited to travel by bus or train.

"Vanpool" means any highway vehicle
that:

(1) Has the seating capacity of at least six adults,
not including the driver; and

(2) Is reasonably expected to use at least eighty per
cent of the mileage for the purpose of transporting a number of employees equal
to at least fifty per cent of the seating capacity of the vehicle, not
including the driver, in connection with travel between the residence and place
of employment of employees. [L 2015, c 205, §2]

Note

Counties responsible for creating and implementing any
commuter benefits programs established pursuant to this section. L 2015, c
205, §3.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next